Alaska, session 34, HB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 08.36.355(c) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 04 (4) "opioid overdose drug" has the meaning given in AS 17.20.085(g). 05 * Sec. 2. AS 08.36.355 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (d) A licensee who issues a prescription for an opioid to a patient shall offer 07 the patient a prescription for an opioid overdose drug if 08 (1) the prescription is for an opioid that exceeds a three-day supply; 09 (2) the prescription is for a total daily opioid dosage representing a 10 morphine milligram equivalent of 50 milligrams or more; 11 (3) the patient is concurrently prescribed a benzodiazepine; or 12 (4) the patient has a history of overdose or substance use disorder. 13 * Sec. 3. AS 08.64.363(c) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 14 (4) "opioid overdose drug" has the meaning given in AS 17.20.085(g). 15 * Sec. 4. AS 08.64.363 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 01 (d) A licensee who issues a prescription for an opioid to a patient shall offer 02 the patient a prescription for an opioid overdose drug if 03 (1) the prescription is for an opioid that exceeds a three-day supply; 04 (2) the prescription is for a total daily opioid dosage representing a 05 morphine milligram equivalent of 50 milligrams or more; 06 (3) the patient is concurrently prescribed a benzodiazepine; or 07 (4) the patient has a history of overdose or substance use disorder. 08 * Sec. 5. AS 08.68.705(d) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 09 (4) "opioid overdose drug" has the meaning given in AS 17.20.085(g). 10 * Sec. 6. AS 08.68.705 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 11 (e) An advanced practice registered nurse who issues a prescription for an 12 opioid to a patient shall offer the patient a prescription for an opioid overdose drug if 13 (1) the prescription is for an opioid that exceeds a three-day supply; 14 (2) the prescription is for a total daily opioid dosage representing a 15 morphine milligram equivalent of 50 milligrams or more; 16 (3) the patient is concurrently prescribed a benzodiazepine; or 17 (4) the patient has a history of overdose or substance use disorder. 18 * Sec. 7. AS 08.72.276 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 19 (c) A licensee who issues a prescription for an opioid to a patient shall offer 20 the patient a prescription for an opioid overdose drug if 21 (1) the prescription is for an opioid that exceeds a three-day supply; 22 (2) the prescription is for a total daily opioid dosage representing a 23 morphine milligram equivalent of 50 milligrams or more; 24 (3) the patient is concurrently prescribed a benzodiazepine; or 25 (4) the patient has a history of overdose or substance use disorder. 26 (d) In this section, "opioid overdose drug" has the meaning given in 27 AS 17.20.085(g). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.